California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
-------------------------------------------

7213.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Local agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 53084.5 of the Government Code.

(2) “Rebated sales and use tax revenues” means any direct or indirect payment, transfer, diversion, or rebate of any tax revenue resulting from the imposition of a sales and use tax under this chapter to any person pursuant to an agreement.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 7056, a local agency shall publish on its internet website, on or before April 30 of each year, the information submitted to the department
 pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) (A) A hyperlink to an internet web page containing the information submitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (d) shall be present and visible on the home page of the local agency’s internet website at all times.

 (B) If a local agency maintains an internet web page containing information about the local agency’s economic development subsidies, including, but not limited to, the information required pursuant to Sections 53083 and 53083.1 of the Government Code, the local agency may include the information submitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (d) on that internet web page.

(c) A local agency that has not directly or indirectly paid, transferred, diverted, or rebated any sales and use tax revenues pursuant to an agreement in the immediately preceding fiscal year shall, by April 30, report this fact to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department and shall be exempt from the posting requirement outlined in subdivision (b).

(d) Notwithstanding Section 7056, on or before April 30 of each year, for each agreement that resulted in rebated sales and use tax revenue during the immediately preceding fiscal year, a local agency shall report to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, the following
 information:

(1) The name or names of any parties to the agreement.

(2) The total dollar amount of rebated sales and use tax revenues received by each party to the agreement on or after the date of the execution of the agreement through and including June 30 of the fiscal year immediately preceding the date of the report.

(3) The total dollar amount of rebated sales and use tax revenues received by each party to the agreement during the fiscal year immediately preceding the date of the report.

(4) The date on which the agreement was originally executed, and the date on which the agreement terminated or will terminate, absent any renewal.

(5) The percentage of a retailer’s sales and use taxes, if any, used to calculate or otherwise determine the rebated sales and use tax revenues received by each party to the agreement.

(6) The percentage of a retailer’s sales and use taxes, if any, used to calculate or otherwise determine the rebated sales and use tax revenues received by any other person that is not a party to the agreement.

(e) (1) (A) (i) If a local agency fails to timely provide the information required pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), or fails to publish information to its internet website pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall notify the local agency by certified mail
 that it has 45 days from the mailing of the notice to provide or publish the required information or submit a statement to the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, explaining why it is unable to provide or publish the
 required information within the 45-day period.

(ii) (I) If a local agency provides a statement pursuant to clause (i), the department may extend
 the 45-day period to provide or publish the required information by 30 days if the local agency demonstrates that the failure to timely comply with the applicable requirement was due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the local agency’s control, occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care, and occurred in the absence of willful neglect. The department shall not grant an extension for a local agency based on the local agency’s claim that the information is confidential.

(II) If the department grants an extension pursuant to subclause (I), the department
 shall notify the local agency by certified mail that it has 30 days to provide or publish the required information commencing on the next business day following the expiration of the 45-day period provided in clause (i).

(III) If the department declines to grant an extension pursuant to subclause (I), the local agency shall provide or publish the required information within 10 days
 after the
 department notifies the local agency by certified mail that it has denied the extension.

(iii) The notice shall be addressed to the person authorized to receive confidential data at the local agency’s address as it appears in the department’s records. The mailing of the notice shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in the United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.

(B) If a local agency fails to provide or publish the information
 within the applicable period determined pursuant to subparagraph (A), the department may impose a penalty
 for each day after expiration of the applicable period the local agency fails to provide or publish the information, up to 365 days after the expiration of the applicable period, as follows:

(i) For days one to 180, inclusive, one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day.

(ii) For days 181 to 365, inclusive, four thousand dollars ($4,000) per day.

(2) The provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 55121) of Part 30 apply with respect to the collection of the penalties imposed pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) All amounts required to be paid pursuant to paragraph (1), less adjustments
 and costs of administration, shall be deposited into the General Fund. 

(f) Notwithstanding Section 7056, on or before June 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the department shall publish on its internet website the information submitted pursuant to
 subdivision (d).

(g) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this section. Until January 1, 2026, the department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce any emergency regulations as necessary to implement, administer, and enforce its duties under this section. Any emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption and readoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
 and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other law, the emergency regulations adopted by the department may remain in effect for two years from adoption and may be readopted in accordance with subdivision (h) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   (AB 2854)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bradley-Burns Bill of Rights [7221. - 7226.]

7221.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Bradley-Burns Bill of Rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 702, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7222.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Contract” means any agreement for state administration of local sales and use taxes.

(b) “Local jurisdiction” means any local agency authorized to impose a tax under this part or in conformity with this part.

(c) “Local tax” means any tax imposed by a local jurisdiction under this part or any tax imposed in conformity with this
 part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 702, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7223.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Each local jurisdiction that has a contract with the board has the right to depend on the board’s staff to provide informative and responsive services to help local jurisdictions understand the local sales and use tax laws administered by the board.

(b) Local jurisdictions have the right to receive and the board has an obligation to provide open, uniform, and consistent
 administration of the local taxes in order that local jurisdictions may perform competent audit oversight and accountability of those revenues on their own behalf.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 702, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7224.

Each local jurisdiction has the right to have the law administered in a uniform manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 702, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7225.

Each local jurisdiction has the right to rely on the board’s written information and answers to questions. Each local jurisdiction has the right to prompt and accurate responses from the board or its staff. Each local jurisdiction has the right to a written response to questions, and resolution of, any inquiry submitted in writing to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 702, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7226.

In addition to any charges imposed by the board pursuant to Section 7204.3, the board shall charge local jurisdictions for the costs of the board’s services as required by this act. Any amount charged by the board pursuant to this section shall be deducted from those revenues collected by the board on behalf of local jurisdictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 702, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.55. MOTOR CARRIERS [7231. - 7238.]



  CHAPTER 1. Motor Carriers of Property Permit Fee [7231. - 7236.]

7231.

(a) This chapter may be cited as the Motor Carriers of Property Permit Fee Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that a safe and efficient transportation system is essential to the welfare of the state, and an important part of the system is service rendered by motor carriers of property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 652, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7232.

(a) Every motor carrier of property shall annually pay a permit fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles. The fees contained in this section are due and shall be paid by each carrier at the time of application for an initial motor carrier permit, and upon annual renewal, with the Department of Motor Vehicles, pursuant to the Motor Carriers of Property Permit Act, as set forth in Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600) of the Vehicle Code. The Department of Motor Vehicles may, upon initial application for a motor carrier permit, assign
 an expiration date not less than six months, nor more than 18 months, from date of application, and may charge one-twelfth of the annual fee for each month covered by the initial permit. The fee paid by each motor carrier of property shall be based on the number of commercial motor vehicles operated in California by the motor carrier of property.

(b) As used in this chapter, “motor carrier of property” means any person who operates any commercial motor vehicle as defined in subdivision (d). “Motor carrier of property” does not include a household goods carrier, as defined in Section 5109 of the Public Utilities Code, a household goods carrier transporting used office, store, and institution furniture and fixtures under its household goods carrier permits pursuant to Section 5137 of the Public Utilities Code, persons providing only transportation of passengers, or a passenger stage corporation transporting baggage and express upon a passenger
 vehicle incidental to the transportation of passengers.

(c) As used in this chapter, “for-hire motor carrier of property” means a motor carrier of property, as defined in subdivision (b), who transports property for compensation.

(d) As used in this chapter, “commercial motor vehicle” means any self-propelled vehicle listed in subdivisions (a), (b), (f), (g), and (k) of Section 34500 of the Vehicle Code, any motor truck of two or more axles that is more than 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating, and any other motor vehicle used to transport property for compensation. “Commercial motor vehicle” does not include vehicles operated by household goods carriers, as defined in Section 5109 of the Public Utilities Code, vehicles operated by household goods carriers to transport used office, store, and institution furniture and fixtures under their household goods carrier permit
 pursuant to Section 5137 of the Public Utilities Code, pickup trucks as defined in Section 471 of the Vehicle Code, two-axle daily rental trucks with gross vehicle weight ratings less than 26,001 pounds when operated in noncommercial use or a motor truck or two-axle truck trailer operated in noncommercial use with a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) of less than 26,001 pounds used solely to tow a camp trailer, trailer coach, fifth wheel travel trailer, or utility trailer.

(e) The “number of commercial motor vehicles operated by the motor carrier of property” as used in this section means all of the commercial motor vehicles owned, registered to, or leased by the carrier. For interstate and foreign motor carriers of property the fees set forth in subdivision (a) shall be apportioned based on the percentage of fleet miles traveled in California in intrastate commerce. In the absence of records to establish intrastate fleet miles, the fees set
 forth in subdivision (a) shall be apportioned on total fleet miles traveled in California.

(f) For purposes of this chapter, “private carrier” means a motor carrier of property, as defined in subdivision (b), who does not transport any goods or property for compensation.

(g) (1) Fees contained in this chapter shall not apply to a motor carrier of property while engaged solely in interstate or foreign transportation of property by motor vehicle. A motor carrier of property shall not engage in any interstate or foreign transportation of property for compensation by motor vehicle on any public highway in this state without first having registered the operation with the Department of Motor Vehicles or with the carrier’s base registration state, if other than California, as determined in accordance with final regulations issued pursuant to the Federal Unified
 Carrier Registration Act of 2005 (P.L.109-59). To register with the Department of Motor Vehicles, carriers specified in this subdivision shall comply with the following:

(A) When the operation requires authority from the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration under the Federal Unified Carrier Registration Act of 2005 (P.L.109-59), or authority from another federal regulatory agency, a copy of that authority shall be filed with the initial application for registration. A copy of any additions or amendments to the authority shall be filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(B) If the operation does not require authority from the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration under the Federal Unified Carrier Registration Act of 2005 (P.L.109-59), or authority from another federal regulatory agency, an affidavit of that exempt status shall be filed with the application for
 registration.

(2) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall grant registration upon the filing of the application pursuant to applicable law and the payment of any applicable fees, subject to the carrier’s compliance with this chapter.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to household goods carriers, as defined in Section 5109 of the Public Utilities Code, and motor carriers engaged in the transportation of passengers for compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 66, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7233.

No city, county, or city and county, shall assess, levy, or collect an excise or license tax of any kind, character, or description whatever upon the transportation business conducted on or after the effective date of this chapter, by any for-hire motor carrier of property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 48.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7234.

(a) The uniform business license tax fee imposed by this chapter is in lieu of all city, county, or city and county excise or license taxes of any kind, character, or description whatever, upon the transportation business of any for-hire motor carrier of property.

(b) This section does not prohibit the imposition by any city, county, or city and county, of any excise or license tax authorized under Division 2 (commencing with Section 6001).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 48.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7235.

(a) The Safety Fee and Carrier Inspection Fee imposed by this chapter shall be paid by all motor carriers of property, as defined in Section 34601 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 500, Sec. 2.   (AB 529)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7236.

(a) Uniform business license tax fee payments collected by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Section 7232 shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund. All other funds collected by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Section 7232 shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. The
 following fees shall be paid to the department:

(1) For-hire motor carriers of property shall pay, according to the schedule in subdivision (c), fees indicated as the safety fee, Carrier Inspection Fee, and uniform business license tax fee, based on the size of their motor vehicle fleet.

(2) (A) Private carriers of property with a fleet size of 10 or less motor vehicles shall pay a safety fee of thirty-five dollars ($35). Private carriers of property with a fleet size of 11 or more motor vehicles shall pay, according to the schedule in subdivision (c), fees indicated as the safety fee, based on the size of their motor vehicle fleet. Any carrier that does not pay a uniform business license tax fee shall not operate as a for-hire motor carrier.

(B) Private carriers of property shall pay, according to the schedule of
 fees in subdivision (c), fees indicated as the carrier inspection fee based on the size of the motor vehicle fleet.

(b) “Fleet size” as used in this section, does not include vehicles described in subdivision (e) of Section 34500.

(c) (1) A seasonal permit may be issued to a motor carrier of property upon payment of fees indicated as the safety fee and one-twelfth of the fee indicated as the uniform business license tax fee, rounded to the next dollar, for each month the permit is valid. The original seasonal permit shall be valid for a period of not less than six months, and may be renewed upon payment of a five-dollar ($5) fee, and one-twelfth of the fee indicated as a uniform business license tax fee for each additional month of operation. Fleet—Size
Commercial 
Vehicles FeeSafety
FeeUniform
 Business
 License TaxCarrier
Inspection
Fee1 $60 $60$1302-4 75125152 5-10 200275252 11-20 240470573 21-35 325650743 36-50 430880961 51-100 5351,0751,112 101-200 6351,3001,463 201-500 7301,5101,512 501-1,000 8301,7151,6001,001-2,0009301,9001,8002,001-over 1,0302,0002,114(2) Notwithstanding the fee schedule in paragraph (1), except for the carrier inspection fee, motor carriers of property with 10 or fewer trucks shall not pay fees higher than they would have paid under the fee schedule
 applicable as of January 1, 1996.

(d) Failure to pay fees required by this section, within the appropriate timeframe, shall result in additional delinquent fees as follows:

(1) For a delinquency period of more than 30 days and less than one year, the penalty is 60 percent of the required fee.

(2) For a delinquency period of one to two years, the penalty is 80 percent of the required fee.

(3) For a delinquency period of more than two years, the penalty is 160 percent of the required fee.

(e) Funds derived from safety fees, including delinquency fees, shall remain in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund and shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature to
 cover costs incurred by the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol in regulating and inspecting motor carriers of property pursuant to Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500) and Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600) of the Vehicle Code.

(f) All Carrier Inspection Fees, including delinquency fees, collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. An amount equal to the Carrier Inspection Fees collected shall be made available for appropriation by the Legislature from the Motor Vehicle Account to the department for the purpose of conducting truck terminal inspections and roadside safety inspections required by Section 34514 of the Vehicle Code.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the fee schedule established in subdivision (c) shall not discriminate
 against small fleet or individual vehicle operators or result in a disproportionate share of those fees being assigned to small fleet or individual vehicle operators. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the amount made available for appropriation pursuant to subdivision (f) shall fully defray the costs of the department for the purposes of the truck terminal inspections conducted pursuant to Section 34501.12 of the Vehicle Code and roadside safety inspections required by Section 34514 of the Vehicle Code.

(h) Commencing January 30, 2017, and every five years thereafter, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall report to the Department of Motor Vehicles the amount that the Department of the California Highway Patrol expended in the previous fiscal year to conduct the inspections and otherwise administer the requirements of Section 34501.12 and 34514 of the Vehicle Code. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall compare
 this amount to the revenue it collected, net of its collection costs, during the same fiscal year from carrier inspection fees received pursuant to this section. Based on this comparison, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall, effective July 1, 2017, and every five years thereafter, adjust the carrier inspection fee specified in subdivision (c) to ensure that the net revenues from the carrier inspection fee are sufficient to cover the Department of the California Highway Patrol’s reasonable costs for the activities described in this subdivision.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 500, Sec. 4.   (AB 529)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Motor Carrier Safety Improvement Fund [7237. - 7238.]

7237.

This chapter is enacted for the purpose of creating a special fund to cover the costs to the Department of the California Highway Patrol to deter commercial motor vehicle cargo thefts and provide security of highway carriers and cargoes throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 48.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7238.

All money or fees deposited in the Motor Carriers Safety Improvement Fund shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature to cover the costs to the Department of the California Highway Patrol to deter commercial motor vehicle cargo thefts and provide security of highway carriers and cargoes throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 48.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.6. TRANSACTIONS AND USE TAXES [7251. - 7279.6.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [7251. - 7254.]

7251.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Transactions and Use Tax Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

7251.1.

The combined rate of all taxes imposed in accordance with this part in any county may not exceed 2 percent. No tax shall be considered to be in accordance with this part if, upon its adoption, the combined rate in the county will exceed 2 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 709, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7252.

“District,” as used in this part, means any city, county, city and county, or other governmental entity authorized, to impose transaction and use taxes pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7253.

“Transaction” or “transactions” as used in this part have the same meaning respectively as the words “sale” or “sales,” and the word “transactor” as used in this part has the same meaning as “seller,” as “sale” or “sales” and “seller” are used in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

7254.

(a) For the purposes of a tax adopted under this part, any retail sale of a digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely is subject to the sourcing rule established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6010.5.

(b) The section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 21.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition of Tax [7261. - 7269.]

7261.

The transactions tax portion of any transactions and use taxes ordinance adopted under this part shall be imposed for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail, and shall include provisions in substance as follows:

(a) A provision imposing a tax for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail upon every retailer in the
 district at a rate of one-eighth of 1 percent, or a multiple thereof, of the gross receipts of the retailer from the sale of all tangible personal property sold by that person at retail in the district.

(b) Provisions identical to those contained in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), insofar as they relate to sales taxes and are not inconsistent with this part, except that the name of the district as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of the state and that an additional transactor’s permit shall not be required if a seller’s permit has been or is issued to the transactor under Section 6067.

(c) A provision that all amendments subsequent to the effective date of this part to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) relating to sales tax and not inconsistent with this part shall automatically become a part of the transactions and use taxes ordinance. However, no
 amendment shall operate so as to affect the rate of tax imposed by the district’s board.

(d) A provision that the amount subject to tax shall not include the amount of sales tax or use tax imposed by the State of California or by any city, city and county, or county pursuant to the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law, or the amount of any state-administered transactions or use tax.

(e) A provision that there are exempted from the tax the gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property, other than fuel or petroleum products, to operators of aircraft to be used or consumed principally outside the county in which the sale is made and directly and exclusively in the use of the aircraft as common carriers of persons or property under the authority of the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign government.

(f) A provision that sales of property to be used outside the district which are shipped to a point outside the district, pursuant to the contract of sale, by delivery to that point by the retailer or his or her agent, or by delivery by the retailer to a carrier for shipment to a consignee at such point, are exempt from the tax.

For purposes of this section, “delivery” of vehicles subject to registration pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code, aircraft licensed in compliance with Section 21411 of the Public Utilities Code, and undocumented vessels registered under Division 3.5 (commencing with Section 9840) of the Vehicle Code shall be satisfied by registration to an out-of-district address and by a declaration under penalty of perjury, signed by the buyer, stating that the address is, in fact, his or her principal place of residence.

“Delivery” of commercial vehicles shall be satisfied by registration to a place of business out of district and a declaration under penalty of perjury, signed by the buyer, that the vehicle will be operated from that address.

(g) A provision that the sale of tangible personal property is exempt from tax if the seller is obligated to furnish the property for a fixed price pursuant to a contract entered into prior to the operative date of the ordinance. A lease of tangible personal property which is a continuing sale of that property is exempt from tax for any period of time for which the lessor is obligated to lease the property for an amount fixed by the lease prior to the operative date of the ordinance. For the purposes of this subdivision, the sale or lease of tangible personal property shall be deemed not to be obligated pursuant to a contract or lease for any period of time for which any party to the
 contract or lease has the unconditional right to terminate the contract or lease upon notice, whether or not that right is exercised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.   (AB 1126)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7262.

The use tax portion of any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted under this part shall impose a complementary tax upon the storage, use, or other consumption in the district of tangible personal property purchased from any retailer for storage, use, or other consumption in the district. The tax shall be at a rate of one-eighth of 1 percent, or a multiple thereof, of the sales price of the property whose storage, use, or other
 consumption is subject to the tax, and the ordinance shall include provisions in substance as follows:

(a) Provisions identical to those contained in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), insofar as they relate to use taxes and are not inconsistent with this part, except that the name of the district as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of the state. The name of the district shall be substituted for the word “state” in the phrase “retailer engaged in business in this state” in Section 6203 and in the definition of that phrase.

The following additional provisions shall be included:

(1) “A retailer engaged in business in the district” shall also include any retailer that, in the preceding calendar year or the current calendar year, has total combined sales of tangible personal property in this state or for delivery in the
 state by the retailer and all persons related to the retailer that exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). For purposes of this section, a person is related to another person if both persons are related to each other pursuant to Section 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a retailer engaged in business in the district shall not be required to collect use tax from the purchaser of tangible personal property, unless the retailer ships or delivers the property into the district or participates within the district in making the sale of the property, including, but not limited to, soliciting or receiving the order, either directly or indirectly, at a place of business of the retailer in the district or through any representative, agent, canvasser, solicitor, subsidiary, or person in the district under the authority of the retailer.

(3) “A retailer engaged in business in the district” shall also include any retailer of any of the following: vehicles subject to registration pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code, aircraft licensed in compliance with Section 21411 of the Public Utilities Code, or undocumented vessels registered under Division 3.5 (commencing with Section 9840) of the Vehicle Code. That retailer shall be required to collect use tax from any purchaser who registers or licenses the vehicle, vessel, or aircraft at an address in the district.

(b) A provision that all amendments to the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) relating to the use tax and not inconsistent with this part shall automatically become a part of the ordinance. However, no amendment shall operate so as to affect the rate of tax imposed by the district’s board.

(c) A provision that the amount subject to tax shall not include the amount of any sales tax or use tax imposed by the State of California or by any city, city and county, or county pursuant to the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the amount of any state-administered transactions or use tax.

(d) A provision that any person subject to a use tax under an ordinance adopted pursuant to this part shall be entitled to credit against that tax or any transactions tax, or to reimbursement for a transactions tax, paid to a district or retailer in a district imposing a transactions and use tax pursuant to this part.

(e) A provision that, in addition to the exemptions provided in Sections 6366 and 6366.1, the storage, use, or other consumption of tangible personal
 property, other than fuel or petroleum products, purchased by operators of aircraft, and used or consumed by the operators directly and exclusively in the use of the aircraft as common carriers of persons or property for hire or compensation under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued pursuant to the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign government, is exempt from the use tax.

(f) A provision that the storage, use, or other consumption in the district of tangible personal property is exempt from the tax if the purchaser is obligated to purchase the property for a fixed price pursuant to a contract entered into prior to the operative date of the ordinance. The possession of, or the exercise of any right or power over, tangible personal property under a lease which is a continuing purchase of the property is exempt from tax for any period of time for which the lessee is obligated to lease the property for an
 amount fixed by a lease entered into prior to the operative date of the ordinance. For purposes of this subdivision, the storage, use, or other consumption of, or possession of, or exercise of any right or power over, tangible personal property shall be deemed not to be obligated pursuant to a contract or lease for any period of time for which any party to the contract or lease has the unconditional right to terminate the contract or lease upon notice, whether or not the right is exercised.

(g) Any provision in an ordinance that is required to be included pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall become operative on April 25, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 34, Sec. 10.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7262.2.

The transactions and use tax ordinance of a district adopted pursuant to this part, shall be deemed to adopt by reference the provisions of Sections 7261 and 7262, as now in effect or as later amended, which are required to be included in the ordinance, regardless of whether or not the ordinance was adopted or amended prior to or after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 591, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

7262.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority may adopt an ordinance imposing a transactions and use tax at a rate of 0.125 percent, provided that all other provisions of this part and Article 9 (commencing with Section 100250) of Chapter 5 of Part 12 of the Public Utilities Code are complied with by the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 430, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7263.

For the purposes of a transactions tax imposed by an ordinance adopted pursuant to this part, all retail transactions are consummated at the place of business of the retailer unless the tangible personal property sold is delivered by the retailer or his agent to an out-of-state destination or to a common carrier for delivery to an out-of-state destination. The gross receipts from such sales shall include delivery charges, when such charges are subject to the state sales and use tax, regardless of the place to which delivery is made. In the event a retailer has no permanent place of business in the state or has more than one place of business, the place or places at which the
 retail sales are consummated for the purpose of a transactions tax imposed by an ordinance adopted pursuant to this part shall be determined under rules and regulations to be prescribed and adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

7265.

No ordinance adopted pursuant to this part shall be operative on other than the first day of a calendar quarter, or prior to the first day of the first calendar quarter, commencing more than 110 days after the election on the ordinance proposing the tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 462, Sec. 3.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7267.

(a) Except as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7275), there shall be no recovery from the state for the imposition of any unconstitutional or otherwise invalid tax that is levied in conformity with this part.

(b) If a final and nonappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction determines that a district transactions and use tax is unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, the district, the county, or the city, as the case may be, shall transfer to the board
 the revenues derived from the unconstitutional or invalid transactions and use taxes necessary to reimburse claimants for the unconstitutional or invalid transactions and use taxes paid, including interest allowed under Section 6907. The board shall deposit these revenues in a segregated impound account in the Retail Sales Tax Fund, as described in Section 7275, and shall administer any refunds necessitated by the court’s decision in accordance with the guidelines set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7275) to the extent feasible and practical.
